Washington statutes.
RCW 11.40.020

Notice to creditors—Manner—Filings—Publication.

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a personal representative may give notice to the creditors of the decedent, in substantially the form set forth in RCW 11.40.030, announcing the personal representative's appointment and requiring that persons having claims against the decedent present their claims within the time specified in RCW 11.40.051 or be forever barred as to claims against the decedent's probate and nonprobate assets. If notice is given:

(a) The personal representative shall file the notice with the court;

(b) The personal representative shall cause the notice to be published once each week for three successive weeks in a legal newspaper in the county in which the estate is being administered;

(c) The personal representative may, at any time during the probate proceeding, give actual notice to creditors who become known to the personal representative by serving the notice on the creditor or mailing the notice to the creditor at the creditor's last known address, by regular first-class mail, postage prepaid; and

(d) The personal representative shall also mail a copy of the notice, including the decedent's social security number, to the state of Washington department of social and health services office of financial recovery.

The personal representative shall file with the court proof by affidavit of the giving and publication of the notice.

(2) If the decedent was a resident of the state of Washington at the time of death and probate proceedings are commenced in a county other than the county of the decedent's residence, then instead of the requirements under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section, the personal representative shall cause the notice to creditors in substantially the form set forth in RCW 11.40.030 to be published once each week for three successive weeks in a legal newspaper in the county of the decedent's residence and shall file the notice with the superior court of the county in which the probate proceedings were commenced.

[ 2005 c 97 s 4; 1999 c 42 s 601; 1997 c 252 s 8; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 34; 1965 c 145 s 11.40.020. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 108; RRS s 1478; prior: 1883 p 29 s 1; Code 1881 s 1468.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.